Maine, session 132, LD359.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §1304, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 705, §2, is amended
by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
"Assisted project" does not include a project for which the Public Utilities Commission
approved a term sheet or contract or otherwise provided project-specific authorization or
approval pursuant to Title 35-A on or before June 29, 2021 or a project that is participating
in net energy billing and that meets the requirements of Title 35-A, section 3209-A,
subsection 7 or Title 35-A, section 3209-B.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §3209-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 230, §1 and c. 411, §2,
is further amended to read:
§3209-A. Net energy billing
The commission may adopt or amend rules governing net energy billing. Rules adopted
or amended under this section are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms have the following
meanings.
A. "Customer" means a customer of a transmission and distribution utility in the State.
B. "Distributed generation resource" means an electric generating facility that uses a
renewable fuel or technology under section 3210, subsection 2, paragraph B‑3 and is
located in the service territory of a transmission and distribution utility in the State.:
(1) Uses a renewable fuel or technology under section 3210, subsection 2,
paragraph B‑3;
(2) Is located in the service territory of a transmission and distribution utility in
the State;
(3) Is located on the same side of the meter as the net energy billing customer;
(4) Is used primarily to serve the electric load of that customer; and
(5) Meets the criterion that 100% of the net energy billing credits associated with
the output of the distributed generation resource are allocated to the retail account
of that customer.
C. "Net energy billing" means a billing and metering practice under which a customer
is billed on the basis of the difference between the kilowatt‑hours delivered by a
transmission and distribution utility to the customer over a billing period and the
kilowatt‑hours delivered by the customer to the transmission and distribution utility
over the billing period, taking into account accumulated unused kilowatt‑hour credits
from the previous billing period.
D. "Project sponsor" means an entity or its successor or assignee that solicits customers
to participate in a net energy billing arrangement based upon a shared financial interest
in a distributed generation resource.
2. Financial interest required. The commission shall allow a customer to participate
in net energy billing if the customer has a financial interest in a distributed generation
resource or in a generation resource that has a net energy billing arrangement on the
Page 1 - 132LR0401(01)

412 effective date of this section, including facility ownership, a lease agreement or a power
423 purchase agreement.
3. Shared financial interest for investor-owned utility customers; limitation.
Multiple customers of an investor-owned transmission and distribution utility that have
distinct billing accounts with that utility may share a financial interest in a distributed
generation resource under subsection 2. Any number of customers of an investor-owned
transmission and distribution utility with a shared financial interest in a distributed
generation resource may participate in net energy billing, except that the number of eligible
customers or meters is limited to 10 for a shared financial interest in a distributed generation
resource located in the service territory of an investor-owned transmission and distribution
utility located in an area administered by the independent system administrator for northern
Maine or any successor of the independent system administrator for northern Maine unless
the commission determines that the utility's billing system can accommodate more than 10
accounts or meters for the purpose of net energy billing.
4. System size. The nameplate capacity of a distributed generation resource that may
be used for net energy billing must be less than 5 megawatts, except that, if a municipality
is the customer participating in net energy billing, the nameplate capacity of a distributed
generation resource located in that municipality that may be used for the net energy billing
may be 5 megawatts or more, as long as less than 5 megawatts of metered electricity from
the resource is used for net energy billing.
5. Consumer protection. To protect customers who participate in or are solicited to
participate in a net energy billing arrangement based upon a shared financial interest in a
distributed generation resource from fraud or unfair and deceptive business practices, a
project sponsor:
A. Must obtain a customer's explicit affirmative authorization before serving the
customer;
B. Must provide to a residential customer such information as the commission may
require by rule or order in a standard disclosure form before entering into an agreement
with the residential customer to participate in a net energy billing arrangement based
upon a shared financial interest in a distributed generation resource;
C. Must allow a customer to rescind the customer's decision to participate in a net
energy billing arrangement based upon a shared financial interest in a distributed
generation resource, as long as the customer requests such rescission orally or in
writing within 5 days of the customer's receipt of the first bill or invoice under the
arrangement that the customer is responsible for paying in full;
D. May not collect or seek to collect unreasonable costs from a customer who is in
default;
E. Must comply with any other applicable standards or requirements adopted by the
commission by rule or order;
F. May not release to any other entity, other than for purposes of debt collection or
credit reporting pursuant to state and federal law or to law enforcement agencies
pursuant to lawful process, any personal information regarding a customer, including
name, address, telephone number and usage and historical payment information,
without the explicit affirmative consent of the customer;
Page 2 - 132LR0401(01)

G. Must comply with the Maine Unfair Trade Practices Act;
H. Must comply with all applicable provisions of the federal Equal Credit Opportunity
Act, 15 United States Code, Sections 1691 to 1691f; and
I. Must comply with all federal and state laws, federal regulations and state rules
regarding the prohibition or limitation of telemarketing.
6. Enforcement. The commission, through its own counsel or through the Attorney
General, may apply to the Superior Court of any county of the State to enforce any lawful
order made or action taken by the commission pursuant to subsection 5, paragraphs A to
E, and the court may issue any preliminary or final order that the court determines proper.
The commission may impose administrative penalties under chapter 15 upon a project
sponsor and may order restitution for any party injured by a violation for which a penalty
may be assessed pursuant to chapter 15. If the commission has reason to believe a project
sponsor has violated subsection 5, paragraphs F to I, the commission shall report this
information to the Attorney General for appropriate action. A violation of subsection 5 is
a violation of the Maine Unfair Trade Practices Act.
7. Applicability. A distributed generation resource with a nameplate capacity of
greater than 2 megawatts and not more than 5 megawatts may be used for net energy billing
under this section only if the requirements of paragraph A, B or C are met and all the
requirements of paragraphs D and E are met.
A. In order for a distributed generation resource to be used for net energy billing, one
of the following must have been met on or before December 31, 2020:
(1) There is a signed interconnection agreement between the entity proposing the
development of the distributed generation resource and a transmission and
distribution utility governing the connection of the resource to the utility's system
and the ongoing operation of the resource after it is connected to the system; or
(2) There is a net energy billing agreement between the entity proposing the
development of the distributed generation resource and the transmission and
distribution utility.
An amendment, revision or reissuance of an agreement under this paragraph that occurs
after December 31, 2020 may not be interpreted to affect the date on which the initial
agreement was signed.
B. In order for a distributed generation resource to be used for net energy billing, one
of the following must have been met on or before April 30, 2021:
(1) A complete application for a customer net energy billing agreement has been
submitted for the distributed generation resource and a customer has or customers
have financial interest in 90% or more of the capacity of that distributed generation
resource; or
(2) There is a fully executed net energy billing agreement between a customer or
sponsor of the distributed generation resource and the transmission and distribution
utility for the distributed generation resource and a customer has or customers have
financial interest in 90% or more of the capacity of that distributed generation
resource.
Page 3 - 132LR0401(01)

C. In order for a distributed generation resource to be used for net energy billing, the
following must have been met on or before June 1, 2021:
(1) The interconnection study process has commenced for a distributed generation
resource located in those portions of the service territory of an investor-owned
transmission and distribution utility that are not connected to the ISO-NE region
as defined in section 1902, subsection 3.
D. In order for a distributed generation resource to be used for net energy billing, all
of the following must be met on or before December 31, 2021:
(1) There is a fully executed interconnection agreement between the entity
proposing the development of the distributed generation resource and the
transmission and distribution utility;
(2) The entity proposing the development of the distributed generation resource
certifies to the commission that the entity has submitted all applicable permit
applications to the Department of Environmental Protection and the department
has accepted those applications for processing; and
(3) The entity proposing the development of the distributed generation resource
certifies to the commission that the entity has received all necessary local,
nonministerial permits. For purposes of this subparagraph, "nonministerial permit"
means a permit for which one or more officials consider various factors and
exercise discretion in deciding whether to issue or deny the permit.
An amendment, revision or reissuance of an agreement under this paragraph that occurs
after December 31, 2021 may not be interpreted to affect the date on which the
agreement was initially executed.
E. In order for a distributed generation resource to be used for net energy billing, the
following must be met on or before December 31, 2024:
(1) The proposed distributed generation resource must reach commercial operation
by the date specified in the net energy billing agreement or by the date specified
with an allowable modification to that agreement.
An entity proposing the development of a distributed generation resource that does not
meet one or more of the requirements of this subsection may petition the commission for a
good-cause exemption due to external delays outside of the entity's control, which the
commission may grant if it finds that, without the external delays, the entity could
reasonably have been expected to meet the requirements.
The goal for development of commercially operational distributed generation resources
under this subsection and section 3209‑B, subsection 7 is 750 total megawatts.
8. Unused kilowatt-hour credits; rules. To the extent rules adopted under this
section provide for the periodic expiration of unused kilowatt-hour credits accumulated by
a customer participating in a net energy billing arrangement, the commission shall require
by rule that each transmission and distribution utility with a net energy billing arrangement
shall account for and, on or before January 1st of each year, remit the value of all unused
kilowatt-hour credits that were accumulated and that expired during the prior calendar year
to the commission for the benefit of individuals receiving low‑income assistance in
Page 4 - 132LR0401(01)

413 accordance with section 3214, subsection 2. The rules adopted by the commission pursuant
424 to this subsection must:
A. Establish the manner by which a transmission and distribution utility must account
for unused kilowatt-hour credits that were accumulated by all customers of the utility
with net energy billing arrangements during the prior calendar year and that expired
during the prior calendar year; and
B. Establish the manner by which a transmission and distribution utility must remit
the value of the unused and expired kilowatt‑hour credits.
Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, rules adopted by the
commission pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
9. Applicability to projects between one megawatt and 2 megawatts. A distributed
generation resource with a nameplate capacity of at least one megawatt and not more than
2 megawatts may be used for net energy billing under this section only if the requirements
of paragraph A are met.
A. On or before December 31, 2024, the proposed distributed generation resource must
reach commercial operation by the date specified in the net energy billing agreement
or by the date specified with an allowable modification to that agreement.
An entity proposing the development of a distributed generation resource that does not
meet the requirement of this subsection may petition the commission for a good-cause
exemption due to external delays outside of the entity's control, which the commission may
grant if it finds that without the external delays the entity could reasonably have been
expected to meet the requirement.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §3209-B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 411, §§3 and 4, is further
amended to read:
§3209-B. Commercial and institutional net energy billing
The commission shall establish by rule, in accordance with this section, a net energy
billing program for commercial and institutional customers of investor‑owned utilities.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms have the following
meanings.
A. "Commercial and institutional net energy billing program" or "program" "Program"
means the net energy billing program established pursuant to this section.
B. "Commercial or institutional customer" or "customer" means a nonresidential
customer of an investor-owned transmission and distribution utility in the State.
C. "Distributed generation resource" has the same meaning as in section 3209‑A,
subsection 1, paragraph B.
D. "Net energy billing" means the system of bill credits available under the program
as described in subsection 5.
2. Financial interest. The program must allow a commercial or institutional customer
to participate in the program if the customer has a financial interest in a distributed
generation resource, including facility ownership, a lease agreement or a power purchase
agreement.
Page 5 - 132LR0401(01)

3. System size. The nameplate capacity of a distributed generation resource that may
be used for net energy billing under this section must be less than 5 megawatts.
4. Shared financial interest; limitation. Multiple commercial or institutional
customers that have distinct billing accounts with an investor‑owned transmission and
distribution utility may share a financial interest in a distributed generation resource under
subsection 2. Any number of commercial or institutional customers may participate in net
energy billing with a shared interest in a distributed generation resource, except that the
number of customers or meters is limited to 10 for a shared interest in a distributed
generation resource located in the service territory of an investor‑owned transmission and
distribution utility located in an area administered by the independent system administrator
for northern Maine or any successor of the independent system administrator for northern
Maine unless the commission determines that the utility's billing system can accommodate
more than 10 accounts or meters for the purpose of net energy billing.
5. Tariff rate; bill credits. The commission shall establish by rule tariff rates for
customers participating in the program. The initial tariff rate must be established no later
than December 1, 2019.
A. The tariff rate for a customer participating in net energy billing with a distributed
generation resource described in this paragraph with a nameplate capacity of one
megawatt or less must equal the standard-offer service rate established under section
3212 that is applicable to the customer receiving the credit plus 75% of the effective
transmission and distribution rate for the rate class that includes the smallest
commercial customers of the investor-owned transmission and distribution utility. The
tariff rate under this paragraph applies to net energy billing with a distributed
generation resource:
(1) With a nameplate capacity of greater than one megawatt if:
(a) The entity developing the distributed generation resource certifies by
affidavit with accompanying documentation to the commission that the entity,
before September 1, 2022, commenced on-site physical work of a significant
nature on the distributed generation resource and the entity has made and will
continue to make continuous on-site construction efforts to advance toward
completion of the distributed generation resource. For the purpose of this
paragraph, continuous on-site construction efforts include, but are not limited
to, in the context of a solar facility, the continuous installation of racks or other
structures to affix photovoltaic panels, collectors or solar cells to a site. The
commission may share information contained in the affidavit submitted in
accordance with this paragraph with a transmission and distribution utility, as
necessary, to verify a distributed generation resource's compliance with this
section. In administering this subsection, the commission may adopt rules
including, but not limited to, requiring the entity that submits a sworn affidavit
under this subparagraph to provide updated documentation to the commission
after submission of the affidavit; or
(b) The distributed generation resource is collocated with a net energy billing
customer that is or net energy billing customers that are subscribed to at least
50% of the facility's output; or
(2) With a nameplate capacity of one megawatt or less.
Page 6 - 132LR0401(01)

A-1. The tariff rate for a customer participating in net energy billing under this section
with a distributed generation resource not governed by paragraph A must:
(1) In 2022, equal the standard-offer service rate established pursuant to section
3212 that was applicable to the rate class of the customer receiving the credit on
December 31, 2020 plus 75% of the effective transmission and distribution rate
that was in effect on December 31, 2020 for the rate class that includes the smallest
commercial customers of the investor-owned transmission and distribution utility;
and
(2) Increase by 2.25% on January 1st of each subsequent year, beginning January
1, 2023.
B. A customer participating in the program must receive for electricity delivered to
the electric grid from a distributed generation resource in which the customer has a
financial interest a bill credit based on the tariff rate to apply against the costs of
electricity delivered to the customer by the investor‑owned transmission and
distribution utility.
C. A bill credit under the program as described in paragraph B may be applied to any
portion of a customer's electricity bill. Credits that remain unused at the end of any
billing period may be carried forward for up to one year from the end of that billing
period.
D. A customer participating in the program who remains eligible to participate in the
program must be allowed to receive a bill credit based on the tariff rate for a period of
no less than 20 years from the date of first receiving the credit.
6. Rules. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
under this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
7. Applicability. The applicability of this section is limited by the requirements of
section 3209‑A, subsection 7 and subsection 9.
8. Limitation. After December 31, 2023, a distributed generation resource may be
used for net energy billing under this section only if the distributed generation resource is
collocated with all of the distributed generation resource's net energy billing customers and
those customers are subscribed to 100% of the facility's output under this section. This
limitation does not apply to a distributed generation resource with a net energy billing
agreement that was executed on or before December 31, 2023. An amendment, revision or
reissuance of an agreement under this subsection that occurs after December 31, 2023 may
not be interpreted to affect the date on which the agreement was initially executed.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §3209-C, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 411, §5, is
amended to read:
C. "Net energy billing costs" means all legitimate and verifiable costs incurred by a
transmission and distribution utility directly attributable to net energy billing. "Net
energy billing costs" does not include any costs incurred by a project sponsor as defined
in section 3209‑A, subsection 1, paragraph D, a net energy billing customer or any
other entity, as determined by the commission by rule.
Page 7 - 132LR0401(01)

Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §3209-D, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 411, §6, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
A. "Distributed generation resource" means an electric generating facility that uses a
renewable fuel or technology under section 3210, subsection 2, paragraph B‑3, is
located in the service territory of a transmission and distribution utility in the State, has
a nameplate capacity of at least one megawatt and not more than 2 megawatts and:
(1) Is a member of a cluster study conducted by the transmission and distribution
utility with which the distributed generation resource is seeking to interconnect; or
(2) Is likely to receive required transmission approval from the New England
independent system operator on or before April 30, 2024.
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §655, sub-§1, ¶V, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 682, §3, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
V. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2025, solar energy equipment
that generates heat or electricity, if all of the energy is used on the site where the
property is located.
On or before April 1st of the first property tax year for which a taxpayer claims an
exemption under this paragraph, the taxpayer claiming the exemption shall file a report
with the assessor. The report must identify the property for which the exemption is
claimed and must be made on a form prescribed by the State Tax Assessor or a
substitute form approved by the State Tax Assessor. The State Tax Assessor shall
furnish copies of the form to each municipality in the State and make the forms
available to taxpayers.
Sec. 7. 36 MRSA §656, sub-§1, ¶L, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 682, §5, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
L. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2025, solar energy equipment
that generates heat or electricity, if all of the energy is used on the site where the
property is located.
On or before April 1st of the first property tax year for which a taxpayer claims an
exemption under this paragraph, the taxpayer claiming the exemption shall file a report
with the assessor. The report must identify the property for which the exemption is
claimed and must be made on a form prescribed by the State Tax Assessor or a
substitute form approved by the State Tax Assessor. The State Tax Assessor shall
furnish copies of the form to each municipality in the State and make the forms
available to taxpayers.